North Dakota statutes. TITLE 46 Printing Laws
CHAPTER 46-01 Supervision of State Printing

46-01-01.
Office of management and budget to purchase printing.

The authority to purchase and supervise all printing for the various state departments and agencies is vested in the state office of management and budget.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 119, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 38; R.C. 1899, § 38; R.C. 1905, § 37; C.L. 1913, § 45; S.L. 1919, ch. 188, §§ 1, 2; 1925 Supp., §§ 375b1, 375b2; R.C. 1943, § 46-0101; S.L. 1959, ch. 372, § 50; 1983, ch. 571, § 1.

Cross-References.

Office of management and budget, see N.D.C.C. ch. 54-44.

46-01-02.
Printing duties of office of management and budget.

The office of management and budget shall:

Bid all printing requisitions as requested and let all contracts.

Determine the price of any legal notice or publication when requested by any state agency or department, or by any political subdivision. Its decision on the proper fee for the publication is binding and final, subject to review by the courts.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 188, § 3; 1925 Supp., § 375b3; S.L. 1927, ch. 262, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 46-0102; S.L. 1959, ch. 372, § 51; 1973, ch. 365, § 1; 1983, ch. 571, § 2; 1987, ch. 547, § 1; 1999, ch. 474, § 3.

46-01-03.
State printer — Duties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1959, ch. 372, § 117.